Maine, session 132, LD60.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA c. 7, sub-c. 13 is enacted to read:
SUBCHAPTER 13
FLEXIBLE WORK SCHEDULES
§879-A. Flexible work schedules
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Employer" means a private or public employer, including the State and political
subdivisions of the State.
B. "Flexible work schedule" means a work arrangement in which an employee works
completely or partially at a location other than the place of employment or works hours
different than the regular hours of the position.
C. "Inconsistent with employer operations" means, with respect to a flexible work
schedule, any of the following conditions:
(1) The burden of additional costs on an employer;
(2) A detrimental effect, unrelated to discrimination or other unlawful employment
practices, on aggregate employee morale;
(3) A detrimental effect on the ability of an employer to meet consumer demand;
(4) An inability to reorganize work among existing employees;
(5) An inability to recruit additional employees;
(6) A detrimental impact on business quality or business performance;
(7) An insufficiency of work during the periods the employee proposes to work a
flexible work schedule;
(8) Planned structural changes to the business; or
(9) Determination by the employer that the position held by the employee cannot
be performed completely or partially at a location other than the place of
employment.
2. Request; duration; denial. An employee of an employer may submit a request in
writing, including by electronic means, for a flexible work schedule. The employer shall
consider the employee's request for a flexible work schedule and whether the request may
be granted in a manner that is not inconsistent with employer operations. The employer is
not required to grant a request by an employee. The employer shall inform the employee
in writing, including by electronic means, of the employer's decision regarding the
employee's request for a flexible work schedule. If the employer does not grant the request
of an employee, the employer shall specify in the decision to the employee the reason the
request is denied. The reason may include, but is not limited to, a reason specified in
subsection 1, paragraph C. If the employer grants the request by the employee for a flexible
Page 1 - 132LR0105(01)

318 work schedule, the employee and employer shall mutually agree on the duration of time
329 and the terms of that flexible work schedule.
3. Employer may rescind flexible work schedule. Notwithstanding the terms of an
agreement between an employee and employer under subsection 2, an employer, with as
much notice as practicable to the employee, may rescind a flexible work schedule if the
employer determines it is necessary.
4. Retaliation prohibited. An employer that takes action intended to prevent a person
from or penalize a person for exercising rights protected under this section is subject to a
civil penalty of not less than $100 and not more than $500 payable to the Department of
Labor. The penalty is recoverable in a civil action.
5. Collective bargaining agreements. This section may not be construed to limit the
terms of a collective bargaining agreement that provides an employee with rights more
expansive than the rights established by this section.